Utah statutes.
31A-22-1602.   Genetic testing restrictions.

Except as provided under Section 31A-22-620, with respect to a matter related to genetic testing and private genetic information, an insurer shall comply with the applicable provisions of Title 26, Chapter 45, Genetic Testing Privacy Act, including Section 26-45-104.



Amended by Chapter 349, 2009 General Session

